apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="dep/o__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imus</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ias</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ìamus</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iamus</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iais</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eit</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eint</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eres</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eremus</l>    <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ereis</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erent</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="tìng/here__vblex">	<!-- paradigma I del curretore ortogràficu para verbos en [cg]here, excepto schere -->
  <e>       <p><l>here</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="addùghere">       <p><l>addùg</l>     <r>addùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agiùnghere">      <p><l>agiùng</l>    <r>agiùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="allùghere">       <p><l>allùg</l>     <r>allùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ammustèrchere">   <p><l>ammustèrc</l> <r>ammustèrchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="annànghere">      <p><l>annàng</l>    <r>annànghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="astrìnghere">     <p><l>astrìng</l>   <r>astrìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beneìghere">      <p><l>beneìg</l>    <r>beneìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bìnchere">        <p><l>bìnc</l>      <r>bìnchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chìghere">        <p><l>chìg</l>      <r>chìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chìnghere">       <p><l>chìng</l>     <r>chìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="combìnchere">     <p><l>combìnc</l>   <r>combìnchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="concòghere">      <p><l>concòg</l>    <r>concòghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="congiùnghere">    <p><l>congiùng</l>  <r>congiùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contraìghere">    <p><l>contraìg</l>  <r>contraìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="costrìnghere">    <p><l>costrìng</l>  <r>costrìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cumbìnchere">     <p><l>cumbìnc</l>   <r>cumbìnchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cumpràghere">     <p><l>cumpràg</l>   <r>cumpràghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuncòghere">      <p><l>cuncòg</l>    <r>cuncòghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cungiùnghere">    <p><l>cungiùng</l>  <r>cungiùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="custrìnghere">    <p><l>custrìng</l>  <r>custrìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deslùghere">      <p><l>deslùg</l>    <r>deslùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dispràghere">     <p><l>dispràg</l>   <r>dispràghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distìnghere">     <p><l>distìng</l>   <r>distìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèghere">         <p><l>dèg</l>       <r>dèghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="elèghere">        <p><l>elèg</l>      <r>elèghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frànghere">       <p><l>fràng</l>     <r>frànghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frìnghere">       <p><l>frìng</l>     <r>frìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fìnghere">        <p><l>fìng</l>      <r>fìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="giùghere">        <p><l>giùg</l>      <r>giùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="giùghere dae in antis"><p><l>giùg</l> <r>giùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/><p><l><b/>dae<b/>in<b/>antis</l><r><g><b/>dae<b/>in<b/>antis</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="giùnghere">       <p><l>giùng</l>     <r>giùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imbèrghere">      <p><l>imbèrg</l>    <r>imbèrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inchìnghere">     <p><l>inchìng</l>   <r>inchìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indùrghere">      <p><l>indùrg</l>    <r>indùrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intìnghere">      <p><l>intìng</l>    <r>intìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ischìnghere">     <p><l>ischìng</l>   <r>ischìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isgiùnghere">     <p><l>isgiùng</l>   <r>isgiùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ispàrghere">      <p><l>ispàrg</l>    <r>ispàrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ispìnghere">      <p><l>ispìng</l>    <r>ispìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="istrìnghere">     <p><l>istrìng</l>   <r>istrìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="istìnghere">      <p><l>istìng</l>    <r>istìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="istòrchere">      <p><l>istòrc</l>    <r>istòrchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lampalùghere">    <p><l>lampalùg</l>  <r>lampalùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lèghere">         <p><l>lèg</l>       <r>lèghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lìnghere">        <p><l>lìng</l>      <r>lìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lùghere">         <p><l>lùg</l>       <r>lùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maleìghere">      <p><l>maleìg</l>    <r>maleìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mùrghere">        <p><l>mùrg</l>      <r>mùrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nòghere">         <p><l>nòg</l>       <r>nòghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pràghere">        <p><l>pràg</l>      <r>pràghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prànghere">       <p><l>pràng</l>     <r>prànghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pìnghere">        <p><l>pìng</l>      <r>pìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pùnghere">        <p><l>pùng</l>      <r>pùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recòghere">       <p><l>recòg</l>     <r>recòghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="respìnghere">     <p><l>respìng</l>   <r>respìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restrìnghere">    <p><l>restrìng</l>  <r>restrìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retòrchere">      <p><l>retòrc</l>    <r>retòrchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rànchere">        <p><l>rànc</l>      <r>rànchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="règhere">         <p><l>règ</l>       <r>règhere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rùghere">         <p><l>rùg</l>       <r>rùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="subèrghere">      <p><l>subèrg</l>    <r>subèrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sumèrghere">      <p><l>sumèrg</l>    <r>sumèrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suìghere">        <p><l>suìg</l>      <r>suìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tralùghere">      <p><l>tralùg</l>    <r>tralùghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traìghere">       <p><l>traìg</l>     <r>traìghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trèghere">        <p><l>trèg</l>      <r>trèghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tànghere">        <p><l>tàng</l>      <r>tànghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tèrghere">        <p><l>tèrg</l>      <r>tèrghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tìnghere">        <p><l>tìng</l>      <r>tìnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tòrchere">        <p><l>tòrc</l>      <r>tòrchere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ùnghere">         <p><l>ùng</l>       <r>ùnghere</r></p><par n="tìng/here__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèpere">          <p><l>dep</l>       <r>dèpere</r></p><par n="dep/o__vbmod"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dèpere">   <p><l>dev</l>       <r>dèpere</r></p><par n="dep/o__vbmod"/></e>
